Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6734
Fees.

The department shall establish and collect fees for credentialing activities under the Medication Aide Act as provided in sections 38-151 to 38-157.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 24;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 104;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 147;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1290.